Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2919.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; food bank The sum of $8,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for distribution to a food bank that maintains its headquarters in the city of Mesa.